Illinois, session 104th, HB5275.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Drone 5Safety and Interference Prevention Act. 6    Section 5. Findings and purpose. The General Assembly 7finds that unlawful drone operations threaten public safety, 8critical infrastructure, correctional facilities, and 9emergency response, and that existing federal regulation does 10not adequately address State criminal interests. This Act 11supplements federal authority through traditional police 12powers while safeguarding individual privacy and 13constitutional rights. 14    Section 10. Definitions. In this Act:15    "Contraband" means an "item of contraband" as defined in 16Section 31A-0.1 of the Criminal Code of 2012.17    "Correctional institution or facility" has the meaning 18ascribed to it in Section 3-1-2 of the Unified Code of 19Corrections.20    "Critical infrastructure facility" means any one or more 21of the following facilities:22        (1) a petroleum or alumina refinery;  HB5275- 2 -LRB104 19739 RLC 33189 b1        (2) an electrical power generating facility, 2    substation, switching station, electrical control center, 3    or electric power lines and associated equipment 4    infrastructure;5        (3) a chemical, polymer, or rubber manufacturing 6    facility; 7        (4) a water intake structure, water treatment 8    facility, wastewater treatment plant, or pump station;9        (5) a natural gas compressor station;10        (6) a liquid natural gas terminal or storage facility;11        (7) wireline and wireless communications 12    infrastructure;13        (8) a port, railroad switching yard, trucking 14    terminal, or other freight transportation facility;15        (9) a gas processing plant, including a plant used in 16    the processing, treatment, or fractionation of natural gas 17    or natural gas liquids;18        (10) a transmission facility used by a federally 19    licensed radio or television station;20        (11) a steelmaking facility that uses an electric arc 21    furnace to make steel;22        (12) a facility identified and regulated by the United 23    States Department of Homeland Security Chemical Facility 24    Anti-Terrorism Standards (CFATS) program;25        (13) a dam that is regulated by the State or federal 26    government;  HB5275- 3 -LRB104 19739 RLC 33189 b1        (14) a natural gas distribution utility facility, 2    including, but not limited to, pipeline interconnections, 3    a city gate or town border station, metering station, 4    below-ground or aboveground pipeline or piping and 5    truck-loading or offloading facility, a natural gas 6    storage facility, a natural gas transmission facility, or 7    a natural gas utility distribution facility;8        (15) a crude oil or refined products storage and 9    distribution facility, including, but not limited to, a 10    valve site, pipeline interconnection, pump station, 11    metering station, below-ground or aboveground pipeline or 12    piping, and truck-loading or offloading facility;13        (16) a military facility, including a national guard 14    facility and equipment storage area where non-military 15    personnel are prohibited;16        (17) a Department of Transportation facility and a 17    location near or on a road or highway where the public is 18    prohibited;19        (18) a health care facility;20        (19) any aboveground portion of an oil, gas, hazardous 21    liquid or chemical pipeline, tank, or other storage 22    facility that is enclosed by a fence, other physical 23    barrier, or is clearly marked with signs prohibiting 24    trespassing, that are obviously designed to exclude 25    intruders; or26        (20) a commercial service airport as defined by the   HB5275- 4 -LRB104 19739 RLC 33189 b1    Federal Aviation Administration.2    "Drone" means any aerial vehicle that does not carry a 3human operator.4    "Emergency response activity" means any activity 5undertaken by a law enforcement agency, fire department, 6emergency medical services provider, emergency management 7agency, or other governmental agency in response to an 8incident, accident, fire, emergency, disaster, or search and 9rescue operation.10    "Firearm", "laser", "kinetic impact projectile", "chemical 11agent or irritant", "lethal weapon", "bodily harm", "great 12bodily harm", and "non-lethal weapon" have the meanings 13ascribed to them in the Criminal Code of 2012.14    "Operator" means a person who controls, directs, or causes 15the operation of a drone, whether directly or through 16autonomous or programmed means.17    "Part 107 operational waiver" means a waiver or 18authorization issued by the Federal Aviation Administration 19under 14 CFR Part 107 permitting deviation from one or more 20provisions of the Small Unmanned Aircraft Systems rule.21    "Private person or entity" means any individual, 22corporation, partnership, limited liability company, or other 23business entity or any association, society, or organization. 24"Person" does not include any governmental agency, law 25enforcement agency, fire department, emergency medical 26services provider, emergency management agency, or other unit   HB5275- 5 -LRB104 19739 RLC 33189 b1of government. 2    Section 15. Unlawful imaging of emergency response 3activity.4    (a) A person commits unlawful imaging of an emergency 5response activity when the person knowingly uses a drone to:6        (1) knowingly capture, record, transmit, or stream any 7    still image, video, or other visual depiction of an 8    emergency response activity:9            (A) while the drone is operating at an altitude of 10        less than 400 feet above ground level; and11            (B) within a lateral distance of 1,000 feet of the 12        location at which the emergency response activity is 13        occurring, as reasonably identifiable from the air by 14        the presence of emergency vehicles, personnel, 15        equipment, or marked emergency perimeters.16        (2) knowingly use, disclose, publish, or otherwise 17    share any image or visual depiction that the person knows 18    or reasonably should know was obtained in violation of 19    paragraph (1) of this subsection (a).20    (b) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to regulate 21or prohibit the mere operation or flight path of a drone in the 22national airspace system. The offense under this Section is 23limited to the knowing collection, transmission, use, or 24disclosure of images as described in subsection (a).25    (c) A person who violates this Section commits a Class A   HB5275- 6 -LRB104 19739 RLC 33189 b1misdemeanor. Each separate flight or operation during which 2one or more images are captured, transmitted, used, or 3disclosed in violation of subsection (a) shall constitute a 4separate offense.5    (d) This Section does not apply to:6        (1) the capture, transmission, use, or disclosure of 7    images by or under the direction of a law enforcement 8    agency, fire department, emergency management agency, or 9    other governmental agency acting within the scope of its 10    official duties and in compliance with applicable federal 11    law, including any Certificate of Authorization or Part 12    107 operational waiver issued by the Federal Aviation 13    Administration;14        (2) the capture, transmission, use, or disclosure of 15    images that is expressly authorized for a particular 16    emergency response activity by the incident commander or 17    by the governmental agency in charge of the emergency 18    response;19        (3) the capture, transmission, use, or disclosure of 20    images conducted pursuant to, and in material compliance 21    with, a valid Part 107 operational waiver or other written 22    authorization issued by the Federal Aviation 23    Administration, provided that such activity does not 24    otherwise interfere with or impede emergency response 25    activity; or26        (4) the capture of images of any political protest,   HB5275- 7 -LRB104 19739 RLC 33189 b1    march, demonstration, rally, or other assembly protected 2    by the First Amendment of the United States Constitution 3    or Section 4 of Article I of the Illinois Constitution. 4    Section 20. Private use; weapons prohibition.5    (a) A private person or entity operating a drone in this 6State is prohibited from equipping or using on the drone any 7firearm, weaponized laser, kinetic impact projectile, chemical 8agent or irritant, or any other lethal or non-lethal weapon.9    (b)(1) Except as otherwise provided in paragraphs (2) 10through (4) of this subsection (b), a person who violates 11subsection (a) commits a Class A misdemeanor.12    (2) A person who violates subsection (a) and causes bodily 13harm to another person commits a Class 4 felony.14    (3) A person who violates subsection (a) and causes great 15bodily harm to another person commits a Class 3 felony.16    (4) A person who violates subsection (a) and causes the 17death of another person commits a Class 1 felony.18    (c) Construction. Nothing in this Section shall be 19construed to:20        (1) preempt or limit the authority of the Federal 21    Aviation Administration over the navigable airspace of the 22    United States; or23        (2) authorize any operation or equipping of a drone 24    contrary to federal law or regulation.   HB5275- 8 -LRB104 19739 RLC 33189 b1    Section 25. Operation over critical infrastructure 2facilities.3    (a) A person commits unlawful operation over critical 4infrastructure facilities when the person intentionally or 5knowingly operates a drone to:6        (1) operate over a critical infrastructure facility at 7    an altitude of less than 400 feet above ground level and 8    within a horizontal distance of 250 feet; or9        (2) make contact with a critical infrastructure 10    facility, including any person or object on the premises 11    of or within the facility.12    (b) For purposes of this Section, horizontal distance 13shall extend outward from the furthest exterior building 14walls, perimeter fences, permanent fixed perimeter, or another 15boundary clearly marked with posted notices of the critical 16infrastructure facility. Posted notices shall be conspicuously 17posted not more than 100 yards apart along a marked boundary 18and shall comply with guidelines issued by the Illinois 19Department of Transportation, Division of Aeronautics.20    (c) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to regulate 21or prohibit the mere operation or flight path of a drone in the 22national airspace system. The offense under this Section is 23limited to the intentional or knowing conduct described in 24subsection (a).25    (d) A person who violates this Section commits a Class A 26misdemeanor. Each separate flight or operation in violation of   HB5275- 9 -LRB104 19739 RLC 33189 b1subsection (a) shall constitute a separate offense.2    (e) This Section does not apply to:3        (1) the federal government;4        (2) the State of Illinois or any public body;5        (3) a law enforcement agency;6        (4) a person under contract with or otherwise acting 7    under the direction or on behalf of the federal 8    government, the State of Illinois, a public body, or a law 9    enforcement agency;10        (5) an owner or operator of the critical 11    infrastructure facility;12        (6) a person who has the prior written consent of the 13    owner or operator of the critical infrastructure facility;14        (7) the owner or occupant of the property on which the 15    critical infrastructure facility is located;16        (8) a person who has the prior written consent of the 17    owner or occupant of the property on which the critical 18    infrastructure facility is located; or19        (9) the capture, transmission, use, or disclosure of 20    images conducted pursuant to, and in material compliance 21    with, a valid Part 107 operational waiver or other written 22    authorization issued by the Federal Aviation 23    Administration. 24    Section 30. Operation over correctional institution or 25facility; contraband delivery prohibition.  HB5275- 10 -LRB104 19739 RLC 33189 b1    (a) A person commits unlawful operation of a drone over a 2correctional institution or facility when the person knowingly 3and intentionally operates a drone to:4        (1) fly over a correctional institution or facility at 5    an altitude of less than 400 feet above ground level and 6    within a horizontal distance of 250 feet;7        (2) make contact with a correctional institution or 8    facility, including any person or object on the premises 9    of or within the facility; or10        (3) deliver, or attempt to deliver, contraband to a 11    correctional institution or facility.12    (b) For purposes of this Section, horizontal distance 13shall extend outward from the furthest exterior building 14walls, perimeter fences, permanent fixed perimeter, or another 15boundary clearly marked with posted notices of the 16correctional or detention facility. Posted notices shall be 17conspicuously posted not more than 100 yards apart along a 18marked boundary and shall comply with guidelines issued by the 19Illinois Department of Transportation, Division of 20Aeronautics.21    (c) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to regulate 22or prohibit the mere operation or flight path of a drone in the 23national airspace system. The offense under this Section is 24limited to the intentional or knowing conduct described in 25subsection (a).26    (d)(1) Except as otherwise provided in paragraphs (2) and   HB5275- 11 -LRB104 19739 RLC 33189 b1(3) of this subsection (d), a violation of paragraph (1) or (2) 2of subsection (a) is a Class A misdemeanor. A violation of 3paragraph (3) of subsection (a) is a Class 2 felony.4    (2) A violation of paragraph (3) of subsection (a) is a 5Class 1 felony if the contraband is:6        (A) a firearm, firearm ammunition, or a controlled 7    substance, as defined in the Illinois Controlled 8    Substances Act; or 9        (B) the offense is committed by a person employed by 10    the correctional institution or facility.11    (3) A violation of paragraph (3) of subsection (a) is a 12Class X felony if the contraband is Category I contraband, 13including a firearm, explosive, acid, or any item that may 14cause death or great bodily harm.15    (e) In addition to other penalties provided by law for 16commission of a felony under subsection (a)(3), a sentence 17imposed under this Section shall include a fine of not less 18than $1,500.19    (f) Each separate flight or operation in violation of 20subsection (a) shall constitute a separate offense.21    (g) This Section does not apply to:22        (1) a person employed by a correctional or detention 23    facility who operates the drone within the scope of the 24    person's employment; or25        (2) a person who receives prior written permission 26    from the authority operating the correctional institution   HB5275- 12 -LRB104 19739 RLC 33189 b1    or facility to operate the drone over the facility. 2    Section 35. Seizure of drones.3    (a) A law enforcement officer may seize a drone and any 4attached equipment, including any image-capturing devices, 5storage media, or weapons, if the officer has probable cause 6to believe the drone was used or operated in violation of this 7Act.8    (b) Any drone or equipment seized under subsection (a) is 9subject to forfeiture in accordance with Section 36-1 of the 10Criminal Code of 2012 and Article 124B of the Code of Criminal 11Procedure of 1963, as applicable. The State may use forfeited 12drones and equipment for law enforcement purposes, including 13training and counter-drone operations.14    (c) Prior to forfeiture, the court shall provide notice 15and an opportunity for hearing to the owner or operator of the 16drone, unless the drone was abandoned or unclaimed. If the 17court determines by a preponderance of the evidence that the 18drone was used in violation of this Act, the drone shall be 19forfeited to the State.20    (d) Any images or data seized under this Section shall be 21retained only if there is reasonable suspicion they contain 22evidence of a crime. All other data must be deleted within 30 23days unless relevant to an ongoing investigation. 24    Section 40. Civil immunity. The State, any unit of local   HB5275- 13 -LRB104 19739 RLC 33189 b1government, law enforcement agency, or its officers or agents 2acting reasonably and in good faith to enforce this Act are not 3civilly liable for damage to or loss of a drone, except for 4willful or wanton misconduct. 5    Section 45. Enforcement. This Act shall be enforced by 6State and local law enforcement agencies. 7    Section 50. Construction. Nothing in this Act shall be 8construed to:9        (1) preempt or limit the authority of the Federal 10    Aviation Administration over the navigable airspace of the 11    United States;12        (2) authorize any operation or use of a drone in a 13    manner contrary to federal law or regulation; or14        (3) limit or repeal the Freedom from Drone 15    Surveillance Act, the Illinois Aeronautics Act, or any 16    other drone-related or unmanned aircraft provision of the 17    Criminal Code of 2012, the Code of Criminal Procedure of 18    1963, or the Wildlife Code. 19    Section 55. Fines deposited into State Police Enforcement 20Fund. All fines and civil penalties collected under this Act 21shall be deposited into the State Police Enforcement Fund. 22Moneys deposited into the Fund under this Act shall be used by 23the Illinois State Police for grants to law enforcement   HB5275- 14 -LRB104 19739 RLC 33189 b1agencies for drone system detection and countermeasures, 2public safety enforcement, counter-drone equipment and 3training at correctional or detention facilities, and critical 4infrastructure, and related public safety initiatives. 5    Section 60. Rulemaking authority. The Illinois State 6Police, in consultation with the Illinois Department of 7Transportation, Division of Aeronautics, may adopt rules as 8necessary to implement and enforce this Act, including 9standards for drone detection equipment, signage 10specifications, training requirements for counter-drone 11operations, and procedures for coordination with federal 12aviation authorities. 13    Section 65. Annual reporting. Enforcement data under this 14Act shall be reported through the Illinois State Police's 15existing Uniform Crime Reporting (UCR) program. 16    Section 97. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 17severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes. 18    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 191, 2027.